Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB856.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 10 OF KRS CHAPTER
224 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "data center" means:
(a) A qualified data center project that has been approved for a certificate of
exemption under KRS 139.499; or
(b) A centralized facility that:
1. Is used primarily or exclusively for electronic information services,
including but not limited to the management, storage, processing, and
dissemination of electronic data and information through the use of
computer systems, servers, networking equipment, and related
components;
2. Has electrical load that is either fixed, portable, or distributable,
including but not limited to structures that are not affixed to the
ground or are easily removed from a location;
3. Has an expected or actual peak of real-time energy demand of fifteen
(15) megawatts or greater; and
4. Has an expected or actual monthly load factor of sixty percent (60%)
or greater.
(2) A data center shall not commence operations unless it has the approval from the
cabinet pursuant to the requirements of this section.
(3) (a) To obtain approval from the cabinet to begin operations, an owner of a data
center shall submit a water feasibility study to the cabinet to determine if
there is an adequate supply of water for the data center's proposed use and
to estimate the impact of the use on existing wells, groundwater, and
surface waters in the vicinity.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 486
(b) A water feasibility study shall not be approved by the cabinet unless the
study demonstrates that the anticipated water supply yield is adequate for
the project and that the proposed water withdrawals and discharges will not
endanger or adversely affect the quantity or quality of groundwater supplies
or surface waters in the vicinity.
(c) The water feasibility study shall include the following information:
1. The projected water demands of the data center;
2. The source of water to be used;
3. A description of how water will be used, including the amount or
portion of water to be used for each purpose, including but not limited
to cooling, humidity control, fire suppression, and domestic usage;
4. The long-term safe yield of the water source;
5. A description of the amount or portion of water withdrawn that will be
recycled or discharged and by what means;
6. A geologic map of the area with a radius of at least one (1) mile from
the site;
7. The location of all existing and proposed wells within one thousand
(1,000) feet of the property boundary, with a notation of the capacity
of all high-yield wells;
8. The location of all surface waters, including perennial and
intermittent streams, rivers, lakes, reservoirs, ponds, wetlands, springs,
natural seeps, and estuaries, within one thousand (1,000) feet of the
data center's property boundary;
9. A determination of the effects of the proposed water supply system on
the quantity and quality of water in nearby wells, surface waters, and
the groundwater table;
10. A statement of the qualifications and the signature of all persons
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 486
preparing the study; and
11. Any other information that the cabinet may require.
(4) All data centers shall submit to the cabinet an annual water usage report, the
required contents of which shall be determined by the cabinet and set forth in
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A by the
cabinet on or before December 1, 2026. A data center shall submit its annual
water usage report pursuant to the following schedule:
(a) A data center which has already commenced operations before the effective
date of this Act shall submit its report to the cabinet by July 1, 2027, and
each July 1 thereafter; and
(b) A data center which commences operation after the effective date of this Act
shall submit its report by July 1 of the year following its initial water
feasibility study approval, and each July 1 thereafter.
(5) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to give effect to the requirements of this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 1:53 PM Jacketed